Washington statutes.
RCW 16.30.030

Prohibited behavior.

(1) A person shall not own, possess, keep, harbor, bring into the state, or have custody or control of a potentially dangerous wild animal, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) A person shall not breed a potentially dangerous wild animal.

(3) A person in legal possession of a potentially dangerous wild animal prior to July 22, 2007, and who is the legal possessor of the animal may keep possession of the animal for the remainder of the animal's life. The person must maintain veterinary records, acquisition papers for the animal, if available, or other documents or records that establish that the person possessed the animal prior to July 22, 2007, and present the paperwork to an animal control or law enforcement authority upon request. The person shall have the burden of proving that he or she possessed the animal prior to July 22, 2007.

[ 2007 c 238 s 4.]